Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-412
Continuing competency requirements.

An applicant for licensure as an athletic trainer who has met the education and examination requirements in section 38-411, who passed the examination more than three years prior to the time of application for licensure, and who is not practicing at the time of application for licensure shall present proof satisfactory to the department that he or she has within the three years immediately preceding the application for licensure completed continuing competency requirements approved by the board pursuant to section 38-145.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 184.